Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202583-105
Youth rehabilitation and treatment centers; grievances; reporting system.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a reporting system in order to provide increased accountability and oversight regarding the treatment of juveniles in youth rehabilitation and treatment centers.

(2) Beginning on January 1, 2021, the Department of Health and Human Services shall submit a report electronically to the office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare each February 15, May 15, August 15, and November 15. Such report shall include the following information for the prior calendar quarter:

(a) The number of grievances filed at each youth rehabilitation and treatment center separated by facility;

(b) A categorization of the issues to which each grievance relates and the number of grievances received in each category;

(c) The process for addressing such grievances; and

(d) Any actions or changes made as a result of such grievances.

Laws 2020, LB1144, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 38.